Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.050

Duty to comply—Violations—Penalty.

(1) Each bank and its directors, officers, employees, and agents, shall comply with:

(a) This title and Title 30B RCW as applicable to each of them;

(b) The rules adopted by the department with respect to banks and trust companies;

(c) Any lawful direction or order of the director;

(d) Any lawful supervisory agreement with the director; and

(e) The applicable statutes, rules, and regulations administered by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the federal deposit insurance corporation, or their successor agencies, with respect to banks or trust companies.

(2) Each holding company, and its directors, officers, employees, and agents, shall comply with:

(a) The provisions of this title that are applicable to each of them;

(b) The rules adopted by the department with respect to holding companies;

(c) Any lawful direction or order of the director;

(d) Any lawful supervisory agreement with the director; and

(e) The applicable statutes, rules, and regulations administered by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, or its successor agency, with respect to holding companies, the violation of which would result in an unsafe and unsound practice or material violation of law with respect to the subsidiary bank of the holding company.

(3) The violation of any supervisory agreement, direction, order, statute, rule, or regulation referenced in this section, in addition to any other penalty provided in this title, shall, at the option of the director, subject the offender to a penalty of up to ten thousand dollars for each offense, payable upon issuance of any order or directive of the director, which may be recovered by the attorney general in a civil action in the name of the department.

[ 2014 c 37 s 106; 2010 c 88 s 6; 1955 c 33 s 30.04.050. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 58, part; RRS s 3265, part. Formerly RCW 30.04.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.